Idaho statutes. TITLE 33 EDUCATION
CHAPTER 27 PUBLIC LIBRARY DISTRICTS
33-2718. Creation of trustee zones.

Each library district may be divided into five (5) trustee zones with each zone having approximately the same population. To the maximum extent possible, boundaries of trustee zones shall follow the existing boundaries of the electoral precincts of the county. They shall be revised, as necessary, to equalize population and to follow new electoral precinct boundaries following the publication of the report of each decennial census. In order for a library district to be divided into trustee zones, the board of trustees shall pass a motion declaring the district to be divided into trustee zones and providing a legal description of each trustee zone. The board of trustees shall transmit the motion along with the legal description of the trustee zones to the board or boards of county commissioners in the county or counties where the library district is contained and to the board of library commissioners. The board or boards of county commissioners shall have forty-five (45) days from the receipt of the motion and legal description to reject, by adoption of a motion, the establishment of trustee zones proposed by formal motion of the board of trustees of the library district. If the board or boards of county commissioners do not reject the establishment of the trustee zones within the time limit specified, they shall be deemed to be in full force and effect. If a library district is contained in more than one (1) county, a motion of rejection adopted by one (1) board of county commissioners shall be sufficient to keep the trustee zone plan from going into effect. A board of county commissioners shall notify the library board of trustees in writing if a proposal is rejected.

If a proposal for the establishment of trustee zones is rejected by a board of county commissioners, the boundaries of the trustee zones, if any, shall return to the dimensions they were before the rejection. Trustee zones may be redefined and changed, but not more than once every two (2) years after a new set of trustee zones are formally established and in full force and effect.

At the next regular meeting of the board of trustees of the library district following the creation of trustee zones, the public library district board shall appoint from its membership or from other qualified electors resident in each trustee zone, a person from that zone to serve as a trustee until the next regularly scheduled trustee election from that zone, which election shall be held in an odd-numbered year. The initial election of trustees for the trustee zones shall be for terms of four (4) years for two (2) trustees and thereafter their terms shall be for six (6) years, terms of six (6) years for two (2) trustees and thereafter their terms shall be for six (6) years, and a term of two (2) years for one (1) trustee and thereafter the term shall be for six (6) years, with each zone being assigned an initial term length by a random drawing of the numbers one (1) through five (5).

For the purpose of achieving an orderly transition to terms of six (6) years and hold trustee elections in odd-numbered years, the following schedule shall be followed:
(a) For trustees elected in 2005, their terms shall expire in 2011 and the terms for each of those elected in 2011 shall each be six (6) years and thereafter those terms shall be for six (6) years;

(b) For trustees elected in 2006, their terms shall expire in 2011 and the terms for each of those elected in 2011 shall each be six (6) years and thereafter those terms shall be for six (6) years;

(c) For trustees elected in 2007, their terms shall expire in 2013 and the terms for each of those elected in 2013 shall each be six (6) years and thereafter those terms shall be for six (6) years;

(d) For trustees elected in 2008, their terms shall expire in 2013 and the terms for each of those elected in 2013 shall each be six (6) years and thereafter those terms shall be for six (6) years;

(e) For trustees elected in 2009, their terms shall expire in 2015 and the terms for each of those elected in 2015 shall each be six (6) years and thereafter those terms shall be for six (6) years;

(f) For trustees elected in 2010, their terms shall expire in 2015 and the terms for each of those elected in 2015 shall be six (6) years and thereafter those terms shall be for six (6) years.

33-2719. Board of trustees — Meetings.

The annual meeting of a library district board shall be on the date of its first regular meeting in June. The purposes of the annual meeting are to elect the officers of the board, to establish a regular meeting date, and to review, amend, repeal or adopt bylaws, policies and procedures. The oath of office shall be administered to the newly elected or re-elected trustee or trustees on the first regular meeting following each trustee election. The regular meetings of the board of trustees of an administrative only district shall be held at least once in each quarter. All other library district boards shall meet at least once every two (2) months at a uniform day of the month as the board of trustees shall determine at its annual meeting. Special or adjourned meetings may be held from time to time as the board may determine, but written notice thereof shall be given to the members at least two (2) days prior to the day of the meeting. A quorum shall consist of three (3) members, but a smaller number may adjourn. All meetings shall be held under the provisions of chapter 2, title 74, Idaho Code. It is the duty of each trustee to attend all meetings of the board of trustees.

33-2720. Powers and duties of the board of trustees.

The board of trustees of each library district shall have the following powers and duties consistent with the laws of the state of Idaho:

To establish bylaws for its own government;

To establish policies for the administration, operation and use of the library or libraries under its control;

To employ and evaluate a library director or library director team to administer the library;

To create job descriptions, personnel policies, and compensation packages for library personnel;

To establish an annual budget and to oversee the financial management of the library district;

To establish and locate libraries, branch libraries or stations to serve the district and to provide suitable rooms, structures, facilities, furniture, apparatus and appliances necessary for the conduct thereof;

To acquire by purchase, devise, lease, or otherwise, and to own and hold real and personal property and to construct buildings for the use and purposes of the library district, and to sell, exchange or otherwise dispose of property real or personal, when no longer required by the district, and to insure the real and personal property of the district;

To accept gifts of real or personal property for the use and purposes of the library district;

To establish policies for the purchase and distribution of library materials;

To issue warrants, if used, in the manner specified for the issuance of warrants by school districts;

To invest any funds of the district in accordance with the public depository law and other applicable state and federal laws;

To pay actual and necessary expenses of members of the library staff when on business of the district;

To see to the proper conduct of library district elections;

To maintain legal records of all board business;

To exercise other powers, not inconsistent with law, necessary for the effective use and management of the library.

Individual trustees shall have no authority to make decisions about the policies of the library except as specifically authorized by the board.

It shall be the duty of each trustee to attend all board meetings and committee meetings for committees to which he or she has been assigned.

33-2721. Library director — Director team — Employees.

Except for an administrative only district, the board of trustees of each library district shall appoint a library director or director team who shall administer the library district. The director or one (1) member of the director team assigned by the board shall serve as the secretary for the board without voting rights. The library director or director team shall advise the board, implement policy set by the board, and shall acquire library materials, equipment and supplies. The director or director team shall attend all executive sessions of the board of trustees, except those called to consider the evaluation, dismissal, or disciplining, or to hear complaints or charges against the library director or director team member. No library director or director team member shall be an employee or board member of a library or other agency with which the district has a contract to provide library services.

The board shall fix and pay employee salaries and compensation, classify employees, adopt personnel policies, and discipline or discharge any library director or director team member for cause. The library director or director team shall hire or oversee the hiring of all other employees based on the policies, procedures, and job descriptions created by the library board, and shall discipline and discharge any employee for cause, as necessary, according to the written policies of the board.

33-2722. Treasurer — Clerk.

The board of trustees of each library district shall appoint some qualified person, who may or may not be a member of the board of trustees, to act as treasurer of the library district. This person shall, on taking office, give bond to the library district, with sureties approved by the board of trustees, in the amount of at least five thousand dollars ($5,000), which bond shall be paid for by the district and shall be conditioned upon faithful performance of the duties of his office and his accounting for all moneys of the library district received by him or under his control. The treasurer shall supervise all moneys raised for the library district by taxation or received by the district from any other sources and shall supervise all disbursements of funds of the district by order of the board of trustees.

Under the direction of the board of trustees, the treasurer shall have all moneys of the district deposited in accordance with the public depository law and other applicable state and federal laws.

The board of trustees of each library district shall appoint some qualified person, who may or may not be a member of the board of trustees, to act as clerk of the library board. The clerk shall prepare and distribute legal notices and shall have other duties as the board may prescribe.

33-2722A — 33-2722C. [Amended and Redesignated.]

33-2723. [Amended and Redesignated.]

33-2724. Taxes for the support of library district — Tax anticipation loans — Carry over authority — Capital assets replacement and repair fund.

Any tax levied for library district purposes shall be a lien upon the property against which the tax is levied. The board of trustees shall determine and levy a tax upon each dollar of assessed valuation of property within the district for the ensuing fiscal year as shall be required to satisfy all maturing bond, bond interest, and judgment obligations. For the maintenance and operation of the library district, the board of trustees may also levy upon the taxable property within the district a tax not to exceed six hundredths percent (.06%) of market value for assessment purposes. These levies shall be certified to the board of county commissioners of each county in which the district may lie, not later than the second Monday in September of each year.

In the first year after establishment, the board of a district may, for the purpose of organization and to finance general preliminary expenses of the district and before making a tax levy, incur an indebtedness not exceeding in the aggregate a sum equal to six hundredths percent (.06%) on each one dollar ($1.00) of market value for assessment purposes of all taxable property within the district. To repay the organization indebtedness incurred, the board shall have authority to levy and collect an additional tax not to exceed two hundredths percent (.02%) per annum on each one dollar ($1.00) of market value for assessment purposes of all taxable property within the district. This additional levy shall not be used for any purpose other than repayment of the organizational indebtedness and interest thereon. This additional levy may be imposed for three (3) years.

Library districts may accumulate fund balances at the end of a fiscal year and carry over these fund balances into the ensuing fiscal year, sufficient to achieve or maintain library district operations on a cash basis. A fund balance is the excess of the assets of a fund over its liabilities and reserves.

The board of trustees of a library district may establish a capital assets replacement and repair fund within the library district budget for which district moneys may be budgeted and carried over from year to year. Disbursements from the fund may be made as the board may determine to maintain, repair, or replace the capital assets of the district to remodel or repair any existing library building; to furnish and equip any existing library building; and to purchase or replace major appliances and vehicles necessary to maintain and operate the services of the district. Moneys from the capital assets replacement and repair fund may not be used for the purchase of land or to build new library facilities or to build additions to current library facilities. Moneys in the fund may be invested in the manner provided in section 57-127, Idaho Code. In any year in which there is a capital assets replacement and repair fund in a library district, the amount held in the fund shall be reported in the library district’s budget hearing announcement, along with a list of capital items which may eventually be replaced or repaired with moneys from the fund. The fund shall be included in the annual report filed with the board of library commissioners and in the audit required in section 33-2726, Idaho Code.

33-2725. Library district budget — Public hearing — Notice — Adjustments.

The board of trustees of each library district shall prepare for the ensuing fiscal year a budget and prior to its adoption shall have called and caused to be held a public hearing thereon at a regular or special meeting. Notice of the time and place of the hearing shall be published at least once in a newspaper printed, or having general circulation within the district or in the county or counties in which the library district may lie. The board of trustees of each library district shall also prepare and publish, as a part of this notice, a summary statement of the budget for the ensuing year prepared in a manner consistent with standard accounting practices and indicating amounts previously budgeted for the then current year for purposes of comparison.

During the year the board of trustees may proceed to adjust the budget as adopted to reflect the receipt of unanticipated revenue, grants, or donations from federal, state or local government or private sources, provided that there shall be no increase in the property tax portion of the annual certified budget. Prior to the adoption of the budget adjustment, the library board shall have called and cause to be held a public hearing thereon at a regular or special meeting. Notice of the time and place of the hearing shall be published at least once in a newspaper printed or having general circulation within the district or in the county or counties in which the library district may lie. The board of trustees of each library district shall also prepare and publish, as a part of this notice, a summary of the budget and the adjustments prepared in a manner consistent with standard accounting practices and indicating amounts previously budgeted for the then current year for purposes of comparison.

33-2726. Fiscal year — Annual reports — Audit.

The fiscal year of each library district shall commence on the first day of October of each year. The board of trustees of each library district shall annually, not later than the first day of January, file with the board of library commissioners a report of the operations of the district for the fiscal year just ended. The report shall be on the form and contain the information that the board of library commissioners requires, but in all cases must include a complete accounting of all financial transactions for the fiscal year being reported.

The board of trustees of each library district shall cause to be made a full and complete audit of the books and accounts of the district as required in section 67-450B, Idaho Code.

33-2727. Contracts — Joint powers agreements — Participation in nonprofit corporations.

In lieu of, or in addition to, establishing an independent library, the board of trustees may purchase specified library services by contract from any taxing unit, or public or private agency maintaining a library. Contracts for services shall contain provisions on annual budget procedures, accounting for funds, dispute resolution procedures, ownership of assets purchased with district funds, annual reports and procedures for ending the contract.

The board of trustees of a library district may sell specified library services to any taxing unit, or public or private agency which contracts to make an acceptable annual appropriation for these services.

Any purchase or sale of library services shall be under a written contract that is in accordance with all applicable state and federal laws.

In order to improve or expand public library services, library districts may participate in the joint exercise of powers with other public agencies as specified by law.

In order to improve or expand public library services, library districts may become corporate partners in nonprofit corporations.

33-2728. Bond election.

The purposes for which bonds may be issued shall be: To acquire, purchase, or improve a library site or sites; to build a library or libraries, or other building or buildings; to demolish or remove buildings; to add to, remodel or repair any existing building; to furnish and equip any building or buildings, including all facilities and appliances necessary to maintain and operate the buildings of the library; and to purchase motor vehicles for use as bookmobiles.

District library bond funds may not be used to purchase or expand a building for a contracting agency providing library services unless the district library gains an ownership share in the building proportional to the percentage of district bond funds used to purchase or expand the building.

The library district may issue bonds in an amount not to exceed one percent (1%) of the market value for assessment purposes of property within the district, less any aggregate outstanding indebtedness.

The board of trustees of any library district, upon approval of a majority thereof, may call a bond election on the question as to whether the board shall be empowered to issue bonds of the district in an amount and for a period of time to be stated in the notice of election. The notice of bond elections, the qualification of bond electors, the conduct of the election, and the canvass of election and determination of the result of election shall be in accordance with chapter 14, title 34, Idaho Code, and with the general election laws of the state of Idaho. Provided however, that any such election conducted pursuant to this section shall be held on election day in the month of May or November as provided for in section 34-106(1), Idaho Code. The majority required to pass a bond issue shall be two-thirds (2/3) of those voting in the election. The issuance of bonds, the expenditure of bond proceeds and the repayment of the bonds shall all be as specified in school district law.

33-2729. Plant facilities reserve fund and levy.

The library district board of trustees is authorized to create a plant facilities reserve fund as set forth in sections 33-804 and 33-901, Idaho Code.

District library facilities plant facilities reserve funds may not be used to purchase or expand a building for a contracting agency providing library services unless the district library gains an ownership share in the building proportional to the percentage of district bond funds used to purchase or expand the building.

33-2730 — 33-2736. [Reserved.]

The board of trustees of any school district in which is situated no incorporated city having a population in excess of one thousand (1,000), and in which no public library is maintained under any other provision of law, shall, upon petition of twenty (20) or more school district electors, submit to the school district electors of the district the question whether there shall be a public library established by the district for the benefit of the citizens thereof.

The election on the question shall be held at the same time as the election of school district trustees, next following the filing of the petition, and notice shall be given, the election conducted, and the returns canvassed, as provided in chapter 4, title 33, Idaho Code.

If a majority of the school district electors voting in the election vote in favor of the question a school-community library district shall be established.

No new school-community library shall be established after June 30, 1994.

33-2738. School-community library districts — Board of trustees — Trustee zones.

Each school-community library district shall be governed by a board of trustees of five (5) members, who at the time of their selection and during their terms of office shall be qualified electors of the district.

Four (4) of the trustees shall be elected. The procedure for nomination and election of trustees shall be as provided for the nomination and election of trustees of a library district pursuant to this chapter. Each school-community public library district may be divided into four (4) trustee zones with each zone having approximately the same population. In order for a school-community public library district to be divided into trustee zones, the board of trustees shall pass a motion declaring the district to be divided into trustee zones and present a description of boundaries of each trustee zone. The board of trustees shall transmit the motion along with the boundaries of the trustee zones to the board or boards of county commissioners in the county or counties where the school-community public library district is contained. The board or boards of county commissioners shall have forty-five (45) days from the receipt of the motion and description to reject, by adoption of a motion, the establishment of trustee zones proposed by formal motion of the board of trustees of the school-community public library district. If the board or boards of county commissioners do not reject the establishment of the trustee zones within the time limit specified, the zones shall be deemed to be in full force and effect upon the next annual trustee election. If a school-community public library district is contained in more than one (1) county, a motion of rejection adopted by one (1) board of county commissioners shall be sufficient to keep the trustee zone plan from going into effect. A board of county commissioners shall notify the board of trustees in writing if a proposal is rejected.

The fifth trustee of the school-community library district board shall be a member of the school district board and shall be appointed by the school district board from its members at the annual meeting of the school district board. In the case of division of the district into four (4) elected school-community public library trustee zones, this fifth trustee shall serve as a trustee member-at-large.

The initial board, except for the fifth trustee who shall be appointed by the school board, shall be appointed by the board of county commissioners, and shall serve until the next annual election of trustees or until their successors are appointed and qualified.

If a proposal for the establishment of trustee zones is rejected by a board of county commissioners, the boundaries of the trustee zones, if any, shall return to the dimensions they were before the rejection. Trustee zones may be redefined and changed, but not more than once every two (2) years, after a new set of trustee zones are formally established and in full force and effect.

All other matters relating to school-community library public district trustee zones shall be as provided in chapters 4 and 5, title 33, Idaho Code, relating to school district trustee zones.

33-2739. School-community library districts — Board of trustees — Powers and duties — Fiscal year.

The board of trustees of the school-community library district shall perform the duties required of, and have the power and authority granted to library district trustees pursuant to this chapter, including the authority to levy upon the taxable property in the school-community library district an annual tax not to exceed six hundredths percent (.06%) of market value for assessment purposes for establishing and maintaining public library services. The school-community library district board shall have exclusive control of the school-community library district fund and shall cause to be made a full and complete audit of the books and accounts of the district as provided for in section 33-2726, Idaho Code.

On and after fiscal year 1995, school-community library districts shall have a fiscal year of October 1 through September 30.

33-2740. School-community library districts — Consolidation — Reorganization into library districts.

School-community library districts may join existing library districts according to the procedures set forth in section 33-2711, Idaho Code.

School-community library districts may reorganize into a library district as follows. The board of trustees of the school-community library district shall present a resolution calling for reorganization to the board of county commissioners who shall follow the procedures in subsections (2) through (5) of section 33-2704, Idaho Code, except that no precedent petition shall be necessary. After the required hearing, the board of county commissioners shall appoint the first board of library district trustees and thereafter trustees shall be elected as provided in section 33-2715, Idaho Code. The school-community library district’s dollar amount of the budget from ad valorem taxes shall be transferred without interruption to the new library district and shall be the base of the ad valorem portion of the new district’s budget.

The dispersement of the assets and liabilities of the school-community library district shall be the responsibility of the school-community library district board of trustees should the library consolidate with a library district, organize into a library district, or dissolve.

33-2741. Public library — Internet use policy required.

Public libraries receiving public moneys and governed by the provisions of chapters 26 and 27, title 33, Idaho Code, that offer use of the internet or an online service to the public:

Shall have in place a policy of internet safety for minors including the operation of a technology protection measure with respect to any publicly accessible wireless internet access or publicly accessible computers with internet access and that protects against access through such computers or wireless internet access to visual depictions that are obscene or child pornography or harmful to minors; and
(a)(i) Shall have in place a policy of internet safety for minors including the operation of a technology protection measure with respect to any publicly accessible wireless internet access or publicly accessible computers with internet access and that protects against access through such computers or wireless internet access to visual depictions that are obscene or child pornography or harmful to minors; and

Shall enforce the operation of such technology protection measure during any use of a computer or wireless internet access by a minor.

Shall have in place a policy of internet safety, which may include the operation of a technology protection measure with respect to any publicly accessible wireless internet access or publicly accessible computers with internet access and that protects against access through such computers or wireless internet access to visual depictions that are obscene or child pornography; and
(b)(i) Shall have in place a policy of internet safety, which may include the operation of a technology protection measure with respect to any publicly accessible wireless internet access or publicly accessible computers with internet access and that protects against access through such computers or wireless internet access to visual depictions that are obscene or child pornography; and

May enforce the operation of such technology protection measure during any use of a computer or wireless internet access.

Such visual depiction is a digital image, computer image, or computer-generated image that is, or is indistinguishable from, that of a minor engaging in sexually explicit conduct; or

Such visual depiction has been created, adapted, or modified to appear that an identifiable minor is engaging in sexually explicit conduct.

The provisions of this section shall not prohibit a public library from limiting internet access or otherwise protecting against materials other than the materials specified in this section.

An administrator, supervisor or other authorized representative of a public library may disable a technology protection measure described in subsection (1) of this section at the request of a library patron to enable access for lawful purposes.

Each public library’s policy shall be developed under the direction of the library’s board of trustees, adopted in an open meeting and shall have an effective date. The board of trustees shall review the policy at least once every three (3) years. The policy shall reflect the most recent date of review.

Notice of the availability of the policy shall be posted in a conspicuous place within the library for all patrons to observe. The board of trustees may issue any other public notice it considers appropriate to inform the community about the policy.

The policy may:

State that it restricts access to internet or online sites that contain material described in subsection (1) of this section and how the policy meets the requirements provided for in this section;

Inform patrons that administrative procedures and guidelines for library staff to follow in enforcing the policy have been adopted and are available for review at the library; and

Inform patrons that procedures for use by patrons and staff to handle complaints about the policy, its enforcement or about observed patron behavior have been adopted and are available for review at the library.

For purposes of this section, the following terms shall have the following meanings:

“Child pornography” means any visual depiction, including any photograph, film, video, picture, or computer or computer-generated image or picture, whether made or produced by electronic, mechanical, or other means, of sexually explicit conduct, where:
(i) The production of such visual depiction involves the use of a minor engaging in sexually explicit conduct;

“Harmful to minors” means any picture, image, graphic image file or other visual depiction that:

Taken as a whole and with respect to minors, appeals to a prurient interest in nudity, sex or excretion;

Depicts, describes or represents, in a patently offensive way with respect to what is suitable for minors, an actual or simulated sexual act or sexual contact, actual or simulated normal or perverted sexual acts, or a lewd exhibition of the genitals; and

Taken as a whole, lacks serious literary, artistic, political or scientific value as to minors.

“Minor” means anyone who has not attained the age of eighteen (18) years.

“Obscene” means a depiction that:

The average person, applying contemporary community standards, would find to appeal to the prurient interest;

Depicts or describes sexual conduct in a patently offensive way; and

Lacks serious literary, artistic, political or scientific value.

“Public moneys” means any and all moneys belonging to or collected by the state or any political subdivision thereof including, but not necessarily limited to, any city, county, town or district therein.

The provisions of this section shall have no effect on the provisions of section 33-132, Idaho Code.

33-2737. School-community library districts.